Massachusetts, session 194th, S72.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 130 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official Edition,
is hereby amended by inserting at the end of section 83 the following:-
For the purposes of this section, any permit issued to an individual age 70 or older for
commercial fishing permits, as listed in 322 CMR 7.01(2), shall be issued without requiring any
fees or monetary payments.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon its passage.
of 1